District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.13

Board of Professional Counseling.

(a)

There is established a Board of Professional Counseling to consist of 5 members appointed by the Mayor.

(b)

The Board shall regulate the practices of professional counseling and addiction counseling.

(c)

Members of the Board shall serve a 3-year term. Of the members first appointed to the Board, 1 member shall be appointed to a 1-year term, 2 members shall be appointed to a 2-year term, and 2 members shall be appointed to a 3-year term.

(d)

Of the members of the Board, 3 shall be professional counselors licensed in the District, 1 shall be an educator engaged in teaching counseling, one shall be a consumer member, and one shall have at least 5 years of experience in the field of addiction counseling.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 213
as added July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-126, § 2(d), 39 DCR 3824
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-13, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3608
This section is referenced in § 1-523.01.
1981 Ed., § 2-3302.13.
D.C. Law 18-13 rewrote subsec. (b); and, in subsec. (d), substituted “one shall be a consumer member, and one shall have at least 5 years of experience in the field of addiction counseling” for “and 1 shall be a consumer member”. Prior to amendment, subsec. (b) read as follows: “(b) The Board shall regulate the practice of professional counseling.”